Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.270

Consent orders.

The director may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person's authorized representative, and must indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order.

[ 2003 c 287 s 29.]